Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4742.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [16C.0535] CONTRACTS PROHIBITED WITH VENDORS WHO HAVE COMMITTED FRAUD. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Contract prohibited. new text end new text begin A state agency must not enter into a contract to procure goods or services with a company owned by a person that has been: new text end new text begin (1) convicted of theft in violation of section 609.52, perjury in violation of section 609.48, or aggravated forgery or forgery in violation of sections 609.625 and 609.63, or convicted under substantially similar federal laws; or new text end new text begin (2) held liable for making false claims against the state under chapter 15C or held liable for making false claims against the United States under substantially similar federal laws. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Ownership. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, a person who owns the company is: new text end new text begin (1) for a sole proprietorship, the sole proprietor; new text end new text begin (2) for a business partnership, any one of the partners with an ownership interest in the company; or new text end new text begin (3) for a corporation, any one of the persons with an ownership interest in the company. new text end